Hawaii statutes.
[§329-103] Designated state agency.
The designated state agency shall:

(1) Oversee and administer the collection of
information under the system;

(2) Control access to the information in the system;
and

(3) Produce exception reports as defined in section
329-1. [L 1996, c 268, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next